Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,177
Public benefit, mutual benefit, and religious corporation; designation.

Each domestic corporation existing on January 1, 1997, that is or becomes subject to the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act shall be designated as a public benefit, mutual benefit, or religious corporation as follows:

(1) Any corporation designated by statute as a public benefit corporation, a mutual benefit corporation, or a religious corporation is the type of corporation designated by statute;

(2) Any corporation that does not come within subdivision (1) of this section, but is organized primarily or exclusively for religious purposes, is a religious corporation;

(3) Any corporation that does not come within subdivision (1) or (2) of this section, but is recognized as exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any successor section, is a public benefit corporation;

(4) Any corporation that does not come within subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section, but is organized for a public or charitable purpose, and upon dissolution must distribute its assets to a public benefit corporation, the United States, a state, or a person recognized as exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any successor section, is a public benefit corporation; and

(5) Any corporation that does not come within subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section is a mutual benefit corporation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 177.